Sidath/files/B.foma
### sinhalaC1.foma ###

read lexc B.lexc
define Lexicon;


define A [ක | ​ඛ | ග | ​ඝ | ච | ​ඡ | ජ | ට | ඨ | ඩ | ඪ | ණ | ත | ද | ධ | න | ප | ඵ | බ | භ | ම | ය | ර | ල | ව | ශ | ෂ | ස | හ | ළ | ​ෆ | ඟ | ඬ | ඳ | ඹ];

define B [|ී ව ා |ී ]; 

define C [ප න ් | ප ල ් ල ා | ව |ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ්| ු ණ ු | ේ | ෙ ම ි | ෙ ම ු | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු | ෙ ය ි | ෙ ත ි | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ව ේ | ය | ව ා | ව න ් න  ේ | ි ය |  ව ා | ව න ් න ේ]; 

define D [ද | ස | ග | ට | ත ];


define CBRule1  ි -> 0 || _ "^" [B | C | D] ;
define CBRule2  අ -> ඇ ||  _ A "^" [C|D] ;
define CBRule3  [..] -> ැ || A _ A "^" [C|D] ;
define CBRule4  D -> 0 || _ "^" [D];


define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define B1Grammar 	Lexicon .o.
		CBRule1		.o.
		CBRule3		.o.
              	CBRule2		.o.
		CBRule4		.o.
		Cleanup;

regex B1Grammar;
